Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4313
Injunction; suit prohibited.

No person may bring suit to enjoin the assessment or collection of any taxes, interest, or penalties imposed by sections 77-4301 to 77-4316.

Laws 1990, LB 260, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 35.